Washington statutes.
RCW 6.27.005

Legislative intent.

The legislature recognizes that a garnishee has no responsibility for the situation leading to the garnishment of a debtor's wages, funds, or other property, but that the garnishment process is necessary for the enforcement of obligations debtors otherwise fail to honor, and that garnishment procedures benefit the state and the business community as creditors. The state should take whatever measures that are reasonably necessary to reduce or offset the administrative burden on the garnishee consistent with the goal of effectively enforcing the debtor's unpaid obligations.

[ 2000 c 72 s 1; 1998 c 227 s 1; 1997 c 296 s 1.]